Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1607
Employee benefit plan, defined.

Employee benefit plan shall mean a plan provided pursuant to section 13-1614 for covered employees and covered dependents.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 7.